Hawaii statutes.
§421J-7 Documents of the association.
(a) Association documents, the most current financial statement of the
association, and the minutes of the most recent meeting of the board of
directors (other than minutes of executive sessions) shall be made available
for examination by any member at no cost, on twenty-four-hour loan or during
reasonable hours.

(b) The minutes of board meetings other than
executive sessions, once approved, for the current and prior year shall be:

(1) Available for examination by any member at no
cost or on twenty-four-hour loan; or

(2) Transmitted to any member requesting copies of
the minutes, by the board, the managing agent, or the association's
representative, within a reasonable period of time from receipt of the request;
provided that:

(A) The minutes shall be transmitted by mail,
electronic mail transmission, or facsimile, as requested by the member, if the
member indicates a preference at the time of the request; and

(B) Reasonable costs of duplication, postage,
stationery, and other administrative costs associated with handling the request
shall be borne by the requesting member; and

(3) Maintained by the association for at least five
years.

(c) Financial statements, general ledgers,
accounts receivable ledgers, accounts payable ledgers, check ledgers, insurance
policies, contracts, invoices of the association for the duration those records
are kept by the association, and any documents regarding delinquencies of
ninety days or more shall be made available for examination by members at
reasonable hours at a location designated by the board; provided that members
shall pay for all costs associated with the examination of these documents.
The board may require members to furnish the association with an affidavit stating
that the foregoing information is requested in good faith for the protection of
the interests of the association, its members, or both. Copies of these
documents shall be provided to any member upon the member's request if the
member pays a reasonable fee for duplication, postage, stationery, and other
administrative costs associated with handling the request.

(d) Members may view proxies, tally sheets,
ballots, members' check-in lists, and the certificates of election, if any, for
a period of thirty days following any association meeting; provided that
members may be charged for any costs associated with the examination of the
documents. The board may require members to furnish to the association an
affidavit stating that the foregoing information is requested in good faith for
the protection of the interests of the association, its members, or both.
Proxies and ballots may be destroyed following the thirty-day period. Copies
of tally sheets, members' check-in lists, and the certificates of election from
the most recent association meeting shall be provided to any member upon the
member's request if the member pays a reasonable fee for duplication, postage,
stationery, and other administrative costs associated with handling the
request.

(e) Members may file a written request with
the board to examine other documents of the association. The board shall give
written authorization, or written refusal with an explanation of the refusal,
for the examination within sixty calendar days of receipt of the request. The
board may condition its approval of any such request upon payment of reasonable
fees. Without limitation, books and records kept by or on behalf of an
association may be withheld from inspection and copying to the extent that they
concern:

(1) Personnel records;

(2) An individual's medical records;

(3) Records relating to business transactions that
are currently in negotiation;

(4) Communications that are privileged because of
attorney-client privilege or any other applicable privilege of the association;

(5) Complaints against an individual member of the
association;

(6) Any records, the release of which could be a
violation of any law, ordinance, rule, or regulation; or

(7) Similar records. [L 1997, c 132, pt of §1; am L
2006, c 312, §3]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next